Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-410
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Class VI school district; classification.

All school districts organized as of August 27, 1949, as rural high school districts or as county high school districts and all school districts formed as high school districts only shall be Class VI school districts.

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 294, p. 789;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1101;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 159;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 16;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.